Missouri, session 2026, SB1782.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 85 and 590, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 85.025
and 590.220, to read as follows:
85.025. 1. This section and section 590.220 shall be
known as "Justin's Law".
2. The director of the department of public safety or
his or her designee shall establish the "Illicit Narcotics
Canine Committee" (INCC). The INCC shall work in
coordination with the Missouri Police Chiefs Association,
the Missouri Sheriff's Association, and other law
enforcement entities as appropriate and necessary. The
primary purpose of the INCC shall be to review applicants
and award funds for the requested programs. The INCC shall
have nine members appointed by the director and shall
consist of:
(1) Two members from the department of public safety
or Missouri state highway patrol;
(2) Two members from the Missouri Police Chiefs
Association;

SB 1782 2
(3) Two members from the Missouri Sheriff's
Association;
(4) Two canine officers; and
(5) One narcotics officer or detective.
3. Any police or county sheriff department may
establish a canine program within their department with the
primary purpose of illicit narcotic detection.
4. Any program established by a police department or
county sheriff department under this section shall utilize
law enforcement canines that have been trained to detect
illicit narcotics.
5. All law enforcement dogs and handlers shall be
fully certified as a team by one of the following accredited
entities:
(1) North American Police Work Dog Association;
(2) International Police Work Dog Association;
(3) American Mantrailing, Police & Work Dog
Association;
(4) Missouri Police Canine Association;
(5) United States Police Canine Association; or
(6) Any other approved certification deemed
satisfactory by the INCC.
6. A police or county sheriff department that
establishes or operates a program under this section shall
have the authority to select from which kennel to purchase
their canine, as long as those vendors are on the approved
list designated by the INCC as certified vendors.
7. A police or county sheriff department that
establishes or operates a program under this section may
apply for a grant from the illicit narcotics canine fund in
section 590.220 to cover certain law enforcement dog-related
expenses.

SB 1782 3
8. Each department shall submit statistics no less
than quarterly into Packtrack or a similar law enforcement
dog record management software system.
590.220. 1. There is hereby established in the state
treasury the "Illicit Narcotics Canine Fund" which shall
consist of moneys collected under this section. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance
with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund
and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used
solely to provide grants for the establishment and operation
of the illicit narcotics canine committee under section
85.025.
2. The fund shall consist of five hundred thousand
dollars appropriated annually by the general assembly as
well as moneys received from private sources, gifts, and
donations. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund
in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
4. The department of public safety in collaboration
with the illicit narcotics canine committee established in
section 85.025 shall issue grants of no more than thirty-
five thousand dollars to police or county sheriff
departments for the establishment of illicit narcotics
canine programs under section 85.025. The grants shall be
used for:
(1) The purchase of a law enforcement dog;

SB 1782 4
(2) Training for the law enforcement dog or the
handler;
(3) A kennel build-out for officer vehicles;
(4) A kennel at the officer's residence;
(5) A kennel at the police or sheriff department;
(6) Training aids;
(7) Veterinary bills;
(8) Medical insurance; and
(9) Other equipment deemed necessary by the illicit
narcotics canine committee.
5. If a grant is received by a police or county
sheriff department, vehicles for law enforcement canines
shall be equipped with a heat alarm. All law enforcement
canines funded under this section shall have department-paid
medical insurance for the duration of the law enforcement
canine's working life.
6. Grants disbursed under this section shall not be
used for the purchase of vehicles or salaries.
7. Every canine and canine handler shall train, at a
minimum, at least sixteen hours per month with criteria
established by the INCC.
✓